District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.05

Lack of job protection; procedural protection.

Employees in the Excepted Service (other than those appointed under the authority of § 1-609.04) do not have any job tenure or protection. After 1 year of average or above average performance as determined under subchapter XIII-A of this chapter, persons appointed under the authority of this subchapter shall be entitled to a notice of at least 15 days when termination is contemplated, which may state the reason therefor. The employee does not have any right to appeal the termination. All other provisions of this chapter apply to Excepted Service employees: Except, that persons employed by the Council of the District of Columbia by personnel authorities identified in § 1-604.06(b)(3)(B) may have their employment relationship terminated by the member or chairperson of a committee of the Council of the District of Columbia employing them without further review by way of grievance or adverse action administrative appeals.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 905, 25 DCR 5740
June 11, 1981, D.C. Law 4-7, § 4, 28 DCR 1672
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 103(k), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 3(c), 49 DCR 8140
D.C. Law 14-213 substituted “termination is contemplated, which may state the reason therefor” for “termination of service prior to the expiration date of appointment is contemplated, explaining the reason therefor”.
D.C. Law 13-91, in the second sentence, substituted “subchapter XIV-A” for “subchapter XV”.
1973 Ed., § 1-339.5.
1981 Ed., § 1-610.5.
This section is referenced in § 1-608.56.